Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2024 Act  is added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Administer” means to directly apply a drug to the  body of a patient by injection,
inhalation, ingestion or any other means.
(b)(A) “Clinician-administered drug” means an outpatient prescription drug that:
(i) Cannot reasonably be:
(I) Administered by a patient for whom the drug is prescribed; or
(II) Administered by an individual other than a health care provider who  is assisting the
patient with the self-administration of the drug; and
(ii) Is typically administered in the office of an enrollee’s physician or another of  the
enrollee’s health care providers authorized by law to administer the drug.
(B) “Clinician-administered drug” does not include a:
(i) Vaccine;
(ii) Drug administered through a clinic affiliated with a hospital;
(iii) Drug administered in a hospital; or
(iv) Drug administered in an  outpatient infusion center that is in a hospital or that is
affiliated with a hospital.
(c) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(d) “Health care provider”  means an individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise
authorized to provide health care services in this state.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a health  benefit plan that reimburses the
cost of hospital or medical expenses may  not, for a covered clinician-administered drug for
the treatment of cancer or  a covered drug administered by an enrollee’s oncology clinic to
treat a symptom, complication or consequence of cancer:
(a) Require the drug to be dispensed only by certain  pharmacies or only by pharmacies
participating in the health benefit plan issuer’s provider network;
(b) Limit or deny coverage of the drug based  on the enrollee’s choice of pharmacy or
because the drug was not dispensed by a pharmacy that participates in the health  benefit
plan issuer’s provider network;
Enrolled House Bill 4012 (HB 4012-A) Page 1
(c) Require a physician or  health care provider participating in the health benefit plan
issuer’s provider network to  bill for or be reimbursed for the delivery and administration of
the drugs as a pharmacy benefit instead of as a medical benefit under the plan unless:
(A) The patient has provided informed written consent; and
(B) The patient’s physician  or health care provider attests in writing that a delay in the
administration of the drug will not place the patient at an increased health risk; or
(d) Require the  enrollee to pay an additional fee or other increased cost for the drug
based on the enrollee’s  choice of pharmacy or because the drug was not dispensed by a
pharmacy that participates in the health benefit plan issuer’s provider network.
(3) Subsection (2) of  this section applies to a drug only if the enrollee’s physician or
health care provider determines that:
(a) A delay in care would make disease progression probable;
(b) The use  of a pharmacy within the health benefit plan issuer’s provider network would:
(A) Make death or patient harm probable; or
(B) Potentially cause a barrier to the enrollee’s  adherence to or compliance with the
enrollee’s plan of care; or
(c) The timeliness  of the delivery or dosage requirements necessitate delivery by a
pharmacy that is outside of the health benefit plan issuer’s provider network.
(4) This section does not:
(a) Authorize a  person to administer a drug when otherwise prohibited by state or federal
law; or
(b) Modify drug administration requirements under state law, including any requirements
related to the delegation and supervision of the administration of drugs.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 750.055 is amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply to health care service  contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454,  731.485, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504,  731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to 731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230, 732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and  732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS  733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050,  743.100 to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788[ ,] and 743.790 [ and 743B.221].
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064,  743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160,  743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175,  743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260, 743A.310
and 743A.315 and section 2, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013.
(i) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195,  743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.221, 743B.222, 743B.225, 743B.227, 743B.250,  743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310,
743B.320, 743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403,
Enrolled House Bill 4012 (HB 4012-A) Page 2
743B.407, 743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452,  743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505,
743B.550, 743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800 and section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to  744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the Insurance Code apply to  health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group  practice health maintenance organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the  group practice health maintenance organization wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred  by a physician, physician assistant or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws of the other state is  subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose  of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s classification as  a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 4.
 ORS  750.055, as amended by section 21, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013, section
7, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2014, section 82, chapter 45, Oregon Laws 2014, section 9, chapter 59,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 100, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2015, section 11, chapter 362, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 470, Oregon Laws  2015, section
30, chapter 515, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 206,  Oregon Laws 2017, section 6, chapter
417, Oregon Laws  2017, section 22, chapter 479, Oregon Laws 2017, section 10, chapter 7, Oregon
Laws 2018, section 69, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2019, section 38, chapter  151, Oregon Laws 2019,
section 5, chapter 441, Oregon Laws 2019, section 85, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2021,  section 12,
chapter 37, Oregon Laws 2022, section 5, chapter  111, Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 152,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply to health care service  contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454,  731.485, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504,  731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to 731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230, 732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and  732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS  733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
Enrolled House Bill 4012 (HB 4012-A) Page 3
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050,  743.100 to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788[ ,] and 743.790 [ and 743B.221].
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064,  743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160,  743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175,  743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260, 743A.310
and 743A.315.
(i) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195,  743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.221, 743B.222, 743B.225, 743B.227, 743B.250,  743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310,
743B.320, 743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403,
743B.407, 743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452,  743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505,
743B.550, 743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800 and section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to  744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the Insurance Code apply to  health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group  practice health maintenance organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the  group practice health maintenance organization wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred  by a physician, physician assistant or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws of the other state is  subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose  of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s classification as  a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 750.333 is amended to read:
750.333. (1) The following provisions apply to trusts carrying  out a multiple employer welfare
arrangement:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.268, 731.296 to 731.316, 731.324, 731.328,
731.378, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398, 731.406, 731.410,  731.414, 731.418 to 731.434, 731.454, 731.484,
731.486, 731.488, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620,  731.640 to 731.652, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to
731.992.
(c) ORS 733.010 to  733.050, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695 to 733.780.
(d) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
Enrolled House Bill 4012 (HB 4012-A) Page 4
(e) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061 and 742.065.
(f) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018,  743.020, 743.023, 743.028, 743.029,
743.053, 743.405, 743.406, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535 and 743B.221.
(g) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.024, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064, 743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100,  743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175, 743A.180, 743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252,  743A.260
and 743A.310.
(h) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127 (except 743B.125 to 743B.127), 743B.195, 743B.197,
743B.200, 743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222, 743B.225,  743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258,  743B.310, 743B.320, 743B.321, 743B.330, 743B.340,
743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343, 743B.344, 743B.345, 743B.347,  743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407, 743B.420,
743B.423, 743B.451, 743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.505, 743B.550, 743B.555 and 743B.601  and section 2 of
this 2024 Act .
(i) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to 744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation  of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(j) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160 and 746.220 to 746.370.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) A trust carrying out a multiple employer welfare arrangement is an insurer.
(b) References to certificates of authority are references to certificates of multiple employer
welfare arrangement.
(c) Contributions are premiums.
(3) The provision of health benefits under ORS 750.301 to 750.341 is the transaction of  health
insurance.
(4) The Department of  Consumer and Business Services may adopt rules that are necessary to
implement the provisions of ORS 750.301 to 750.341.
SECTION 6.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 750.055 and 750.333
by sections 3 to 5 of this 2024 Act apply to health benefit plans,  health care service contracts
and multiple  employer welfare arrangements issued, renewed or extended on or after the
effective date of this 2024 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4012 (HB 4012-A) Page 5
Passed by House February 22, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4012 (HB 4012-A) Page 6